North Dakota, session 69, SB2029.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new subsection to section 30.1-28-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
The court may order a guardian to be listed on a registry if the court removed the guardian for
good cause. A guardian listed on the registry is disqualified from acting as a guardian in any
guardianship proceeding. The court shall send a copy of the order to the state court
administrator, who shall maintain and administer the registry. This subsection does not apply
to a licensed guardian. For purposes of this subsection, a licensed guardian includes a
guardian whose license has been suspended but excludes a guardian whose license is
revoked.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 30.1-29-15 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
30.1-29-15. (5-415) Death, resignation, or removal of conservator.
1. The court may remove a conservator for good cause, upon notice and hearing, or accept the
resignation of a conservator. After a conservator's death, resignation, or removal, the court
may appoint another conservator. A conservator so appointed succeeds to the title and powers
of the predecessor.
2. The court may order a conservator to be listed on a registry if the court removed the
conservator for good cause. A conservator listed on the registry is disqualified from acting as a
conservator in any conservatorship proceeding. The court shall send a copy of the order to the
state court administrator, who shall maintain and administer the registry. This subsection does
not apply to a licensed conservator. For purposes of this subsection, a licensed conservator
includes a conservator whose license has been suspended but excludes a conservator whose
license is revoked.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 50-24.1-07 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. On the death of any recipient of medical assistance who was a resident of a nursing facility,
intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities, or other medical institution
and with respect to whom the department determined that resident reasonably was not
expected to be discharged from the medical institution and to return home, or who was
fifty-five years of age or older when the recipient received the assistance, and on the death of
the spouse of the deceased recipient, the total amount of medical assistance paid on behalf of
the recipient following the institutionalization of the recipient who cannot reasonably be

S. B. NO. 2029 - PAGE 2
expected to be discharged from the medical institution, or following the recipient's fifty-fifth
birthday, as the case may be, must be allowed as a preferred claim against the decedent's
estate after payment, in the following order, of:
a. Recipient liability expense applicable to the month of death for nursing home or basic
care services;
b. Funeral expenses not in excess of three thousand five hundred dollars;
c. Expenses of the last illness, other than those incurred by medical assistance;
d. Expenses of administering the estate, including attorney's fees approved by the court;
e. Claims made under chapter 50-01;
f. Claims made under chapter 50-24.5;
g. Claims made under chapter 50-06.3 and on behalf of the state hospital; and
h. Claims made under chapter 54 - 68; and
i. Claims made under subsection 4.
SECTION 4. Chapter 54-68 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and enacted as follows:
54 - 68 - 01. Definitions .
As used in this chapter:
1. "Agency permit" means temporary authorization given by the office to an employee of a
professional guardianship or professional conservatorship entity which allows the permitholder
to provide guardianship or conservatorship services as an agent of the entity.
2. "Identifiable information" means an individual's personal details, including the individual's
name, address, telephone number, facsimile number, social security number, electronic mail
address, program identification number, employer identification number, or any other unique
identifying number, characteristic, or code and any demographic information collected about
the individual.
3. "Investigation counsel" means the guardianship and conservatorship counsel.
4. "Licensed conservator" means a person licensed by the office to provide conservatorship
services.
5. "Licensed guardian" means a person licensed by the office to provide guardianship services.
6. "Office" means the office of guardianship and conservatorship.
7. "Operations committee" means the guardianship and conservatorship operations committee
established under section 54 - 68 - 03 .
8. "Public conservator" means a conservator under contract with the office to provide
conservatorship services for an individual eligible for public services.
9. "Public guardian" means a guardian under contract with the office to provide guardianship
services for an individual eligible for public services.
10. "Public services" means state or federally funded programs administered by the office
available to eligible individuals.

S. B. NO. 2029 - PAGE 3
11. "Review board" means the guardianship and conservatorship review board established under
section 54 - 68 - 05 .
12. "Unlicensed conservator" means a person providing conservatorship services without a
conservator license.
13. "Unlicensed guardian" means a person providing guardianship services without a guardian
license.
54 - 68 - 02. Office of guardianship and conservatorship - Purpose - Powers and duties -
Report - Audit .
1. The office of guardianship and conservatorship is established, consisting of the operations
committee, office staff, and review board.
2. The office, in its capacity of supervising and directing guardianship and conservatorship, shall
operate independently of any state agency that provides services to individuals under
guardianship or conservatorship. The office shall administer programs assigned by state law.
The office may adopt rules to administer and enforce this chapter.
3. The office shall:
a. Develop policies and procedures, including eligibility criteria for:
(1) Receiving public services;
(2) A public guardian or a public conservator;
(3) A licensed guardian or a licensed conservator; and
(4) Distribution of funding for direct payments and expense reimbursements for public
services.
b. Develop ethical standards for:
(1) A licensed guardian or a licensed conservator; and
(2) An unlicensed guardian or an unlicensed conservator.
c. Monitor guardianship and conservatorship services.
d. Develop policies and procedures for proceedings if a guardian or a conservator is unable
to fulfill the duties of a guardian or a conservator.
e. Keep accurate records of all financial transactions performed under this chapter in the
manner required by the office of management and budget.
f. Provide a report each biennium to the legislative management regarding the operations
of the office, including the cost of public guardians and public conservators, and any
other information requested by the legislative management.
4. The office may:
a. Recommend rules applicable to a licensed guardian or a licensed conservator.
b. Grant licenses to a guardian or conservator and agency permits, including revoking or
suspending an agency permit.
c. Require insurance or bond coverage for a licensed guardian or a licensed conservator as
a condition for licensure.

S. B. NO. 2029 - PAGE 4
d. Establish mandatory disclosure and reporting requirements for a licensed guardian or a
licensed conservator, including a process to disclose information or submit reports to the
office.
e. Provide training for guardians and conservators.
f. Provide annual reports to the governor.
g. Distribute funding for direct payments, expense reimbursements, or other public services,
including funding for public administrators.
h. Establish and collect fees to support guardianship and conservatorship services and the
duties of the office, which must be deposited in the guardianship and conservatorship
support fund.
i. Seek and apply for private, federal, or other funds to help support guardians and
conservators and to safeguard the rights of individuals who receive public services.
j. Accept private funds for deposit in the guardianship and conservatorship support fund.
5. The office may not authorize payment for services for any public guardian or public
conservator that provides services for more individuals than allowed through statute,
regulation, or administrative rule.
6. The office, its officers, or its employees may not act as a public guardian or a public
conservator or act in any other representative capacity for any individual. This subsection
does not prohibit an officer or employee from acting as a guardian or conservator in a
personal capacity apart from any duties as an officer or employee.
7. The office is subject to audits by the state auditor under chapter 54 - 10 .
8. The director of the office of management and budget shall allocate office space in the state
capitol for the office of guardianship and conservatorship, or, if office space in the capitol is
unavailable, shall negotiate for, contract for, and obtain office space for the office in the city of
Bismarck or in the Bismarck area. The office of guardianship and conservatorship's office
space may not be located in the office space of the department of health and human services
or the judicial branch and must provide sufficient privacy and security for the office to conduct
its business. The director of the office of management and budget shall charge the office of
guardianship and conservatorship an amount equal to the fair value of the office space and
related services the office of management and budget renders to the office of guardianship
and conservatorship.
54 - 68 - 02.1. Transition - Requirements .
1. By August 1, 2025, each appointing authority shall make the initial appointments to the
operations committee in accordance with section 54 - 68 - 03 .
2. By August 31, 2025, the operations committee shall appoint an executive director and
investigation counsel.
3. By January 1, 2026, each appointing authority shall make the initial appointments to the
review board in accordance with section 54 - 68 - 05 .
4. By March 31, 2026, the office shall:
a. Develop by rule initial policies, procedures, and eligibility criteria for:
(1) Receiving public services;

S. B. NO. 2029 - PAGE 5
(2) A public guardian or a public conservator;
(3) A licensed guardian or a licensed conservator; and
(4) Distribution of funding for direct payments and expense reimbursements for public
services.
b. Develop by rule ethical standards for:
(1) A licensed guardian or a licensed conservator; and
(2) An unlicensed guardian or an unlicensed conservator.
c. Develop by rule policies and procedures for proceedings if a guardian or a conservator is
unable to fulfill the duties of a guardian or a conservator.
d. Set by rule daily rates for fees and a reimbursement mechanism protocol.
e. Establish initial fees to support guardianship and conservatorship services and the duties
of the office.
5. The office may adopt rules necessary to facilitate the creation of the office and assume the
administration of guardianship programs.
54 - 68 - 03. Operations committee .
1. A guardianship and conservatorship operations committee is created to oversee the operation
of the office. The operations committee shall:
a. Appoint an office director and investigation counsel who serve at the will of the
operations committee.
b. Oversee and provide consent to the office for the adoption of administrative rules.
c. Oversee the administration of programs and personnel under the office.
d. Provide input and approval of the office budget.
2. The operations committee shall consist of:
a. Two members of the legislative assembly, one from each chamber, appointed by the
chairman of the legislative management;
b. Two members appointed by the chief justice of the supreme court;
c. Two members appointed by the governor; and
d. One member appointed by the state bar association of North Dakota.
3. Initially, members of the operations committee shall serve staggered terms as follows:
a. Two members shall serve a term of one year;
b. Two members shall serve a term of two years; and
c. Three members shall serve a term of three years.
4. After the expiration of initial terms, all appointments must be for a term of three years. A
member may not serve more than two consecutive terms of three years.

S. B. NO. 2029 - PAGE 6
5. A member of the operations committee serves at the will of the appointing authority, and may
be removed for good cause. A vacancy must be filled in the same manner as the original
appointment for the unexpired portion of the term.
6. A member of the operations committee is entitled to:
a. Per diem compensation in accordance with section 54 - 35 - 10; and
b. Payment for mileage and travel expenses incurred in the conduct of committee business
as provided under sections 44 - 08 - 04 and 54 - 06 - 09 .
54 - 68 - 04. Director - Investigation counsel - Powers and duties .
1. The powers and duties of the director of the office of guardianship and conservatorship
include:
a. Within the limits of legislative appropriations, to employ the necessary staff to provide
services in accordance with this chapter.
b. To contract with guardians to administer services.
c. To grant guardian and conservator licenses.
d. To develop, maintain, and revise a comprehensive master plan for guardianship and
conservatorship in this state, including the needs and resources.
e. To recommend rules to the operations committee regarding the administration of the
office.
f. To develop and submit budgets for the office.
g. To present an annual report to the operations committee on the status of the office.
2. The powers and duties of the investigation counsel of the office of guardianship and
conservatorship include:
a. To oversee the complaint process.
b. To recommend rules to the operations committee regarding operation of the complaint
and appeals process.
c. To investigate noncompliance under this chapter reported after April 1, 2026, by
conducting interviews, accessing records, issuing subpoenas, and ordering depositions.
d. To issue formal disciplinary complaints.
e. To attend disciplinary hearings.
54 - 68 - 05. Review board .
1. A guardianship and conservatorship review board is created to conduct disciplinary
proceedings and issue sanctions for a guardian or conservator. The guardianship and
conservatorship review board shall consist of:
a. One member representing guardians, appointed by the guardianship association of North
Dakota;
b. One member representing family guardians, appointed by the chief justice of the
supreme court;

S. B. NO. 2029 - PAGE 7
c. One member representing the protection and advocacy project, appointed by the
committee on protection and advocacy;
d. Two members appointed by the state bar association of North Dakota, consisting of:
(1) One lawyer licensed to practice law in the state who is not an active judge or
employee of a judge; and
(2) One retired judge, judicial referee, or surrogate judge; and
e. Two members of the public, appointed by the governor.
2. Initially, members of the review board shall serve staggered terms as follows:
a. Two members shall serve a term of one year;
b. Two members shall serve a term of two years; and
c. Three members shall serve a term of three years.
3. After the expiration of initial terms, all appointments must be for a term of three years. A
member may not serve more than two consecutive terms of three years.
4. A member of the review board serves at the will of the appointing authority, and may be
removed for good cause. A vacancy must be filled in the same manner as the original
appointment for the unexpired portion of the term.
5. A member of the review board may not receive compensation for their service but is entitled to
payment for mileage and travel expenses incurred in the conduct of committee business as
provided under sections 44 - 08 - 04 and 54 - 06 - 09 .
6. Office staff, under the oversight of the operations committee, shall develop by rule complaint
protocols, hearing procedures, ethics rules, disciplinary measures, and sanctions. Office staff,
under the oversight of the operations committee, may develop other rules necessary for the
review board.
7. Review board meetings are closed meetings under chapter 44-04.
54 - 68 - 06. Guardianship and conservatorship support fund - Continuing appropriation .
There is created in the state treasury the guardianship and conservatorship support fund. The fund
consists of all moneys transferred to the fund by the legislative assembly, interest upon moneys in the
fund, fee collections, donations, grants, and other contributions received for deposit in the fund. All
moneys in the fund are appropriated on a continuing basis to the office to defray the expenses of
supporting guardianship and conservatorship services, including guardianship and conservatorship
training and monitoring.
54 - 68 - 07. Records - Confidentiality - Disclosure - Penalty .
1. For purposes of this chapter, confidential records as defined under section 44 - 04 - 17.1 include :
a. Identifiable information that may reasonably be used to identify a guardian, conservator,
complainant, or an individual applying for or receiving services; and
b. A report concerning an applicant, provider, or recipient of public services.
2. Confidential information may be disclosed only:
a. In the administration of a program under the supervision or administration of the office; or

S. B. NO. 2029 - PAGE 8
b. When authorized or required by administrative rule, court rule, or law.
3. The office may disclose information uncovered during a disciplinary investigation to the
attorney general or bureau of criminal investigation related to a criminal investigation when the
investigation counsel suspects the subject of the investigation has committed a crime.
4. A person that discloses, authorizes, or knowingly allows, participates in, or acquiesces in the
disclosure of confidential information in violation of this section is guilty of a class C felony .
54 - 68 - 08. Guardianship and conservatorship limitations - Representation to the public -
Exemption.
1. A person may not serve as a guardian or a conservator for three or more adult individuals at
the same time unless that person is a licensed guardian or a licensed conservator or has an
agency permit. This subsection does not apply to an individual appointed as a guardian or
conservator for a family member.
2. A public guardian or a public conservator may not provide services to a minor unless
authorized by a proceeding under section 30.1 - 28 - 03.3 .
3. A person must be a licensed guardian or a licensed conservator to offer guardianship or
conservatorship services to the public.
4. This section does not apply to:
a. A federal or state agency.
b. A financial institution under section 6 - 08.1 - 01 when appointed as a conservator .
c. Human service zones, including human service zone directors or human service zone
team members, as defined in section 50 - 01.1 - 01 .
5. A person who violates this section after Augus t 1, 2026, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor .
54 - 68 - 09. Immunity .
1. A person who in good faith provides information or testimony regarding a guardian's or
conservator's misconduct or lack of professionalism is not subject to civil liability.
2. An employee of the office, a member of the review board, or an agent of the review board
acting in good faith is not subject to civil liability.
54 - 68 - 10. Authority - Appeals - Applicability .
1. The office may revoke or suspend a guardian or a conservator license.
2. Upon receipt of any report or complaint, the office shall assess the need for an investigation of
the report or complaint. For the purpose of investigating a report or complaint:
a. The office or operations committee shall:
(1) Establish confidentiality and disclosure standards for investigating a report or
complaint and subsequent disciplinary proceedings.
(2) Adopt rules to effectuate the powers and duties under this chapter.
b. Office staff may:
(1) Interview an alleged victim, witness, or any other individual with knowledge of the
situation.

S. B. NO. 2029 - PAGE 9
(2) Access any record or information on an applicant, provider, or recipient of public
services.
(3) Issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of designated
documents, electronically stored information, or tangible things in accordance with
the North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure.
(4) Order the deposition of a person residing within or outside the state to be taken in
accordance with the North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure.
(5) Coordinate with other agencies and departments, including the attorney general and
bureau of criminal investigation.
3. Appeals under this chapter must be conducted in accordance with chapter 28 - 32 .
4. A guardian or conservator subject to the jurisdiction of a court of this state shall follow the
rules of the office if the guardian or the conservator serves an adult ward, adult protected
person, or incapacitated person, as defined in title 30.1 .
54 - 68 - 11. Attorney general - Counsel - Bureau of criminal investigation - Primary authority
for investigations.
1. The attorney general may act as legal counsel in any particular investigation or proceeding
under section 54 - 12 - 02. The attorney general shall appear and defend any officer or employee
of the office and any member of the review board in any action founded on an act or omission
arising out of performance of an official duty.
2. In accordance with chapter 54 - 12, the attorney general and bureau of criminal investigation
have primary authority to investigate criminal cases related to a guardianship or
conservatorship.
54 - 68 - 12. Duty to disclose and cooperate .
1. A state or local governmental entity and its officers and employees, and the officials, officers,
and employees of the courts of this state shall disclose records and information requested by
the review board or investigation counsel or any authorized representative of the review board
or investigation counsel and shall cooperate with and give reasonable assistance to the review
board or investigation counsel and any authorized representative of the review board or
counsel unless prohibited by federal regulation or law.
2. A sheriff or police officer shall serve process and execute all lawful orders upon request of the
office, its authorized representative, the review board, or the investigation counsel. The
service of process extends to all parts of the state in any investigation or disciplinary
proceeding under this chapter.
54 - 68 - 13. Duties of witnesses - Penalty .
1. An individual is obliged to attend as a witness in any investigation or disciplinary proceeding
commenced under this chapter.
2. If an individual refuses to attend, testify, or produce any writings or things required by
subpoena, the office, review board, or investigation counsel that issued the subpoena may
petition the district court of the district in which the attendance or production is required for an
order compelling the individual to attend and testify or produce the writings or things required
by the subpoena. The court shall order the individual to appear before the court at a specified
time and place to show cause why the individual has not attended, testified, or produced the
writings or things as required. A copy of the order must be served on the individual. If the court
determines the subpoena was regularly issued, the court shall order the individual to appear at
the time and place fixed in the order and testify or produce the required writings or things.

S. B. NO. 2029 - PAGE 10
3. An individual who fails to obey an order under this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor .
54 - 68 - 14. Preferred claim .
1. The office has a preferred claim against the estate of an individual or an individual's spouse
for recovery of funds expended under this chapter for the care of that individual or the
individual's spouse. All funds recovered under this chapter must be deposited in the general
fund.
2. A claim may not be required to be paid and interest may not begin to accrue during the lifetime
of the decedent's surviving spouse, if any.
3. A statute of limitation or similar statute or the doctrine of laches may not bar a claim under this
chapter.
54 - 68 - 15. Supreme court power .
A court of this state may refer cases to the office. The court may adopt court rules as necessary to
facilitate case management with the district courts, the office, and the review board.
SECTION 5. REPEAL. Chapter 27-27 of the North Dakota Century Code is repealed.
SECTION 6. REPEAL. Section 54-68-02.1 of the North Dakota Century Code, as created in
Section 4 of this Act, is repealed.
SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - OFFICE OF GUARDIANSHIP AND CONSERVATORSHIP -
FULL-TIME EQUIVALENT POSITION AUTHORIZATION. The funds provided in this section, or so
much of the funds as may be necessary, are appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the
state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, to the office of guardianship and conservatorship for the
purpose of defraying the expenses of the office of guardianship and conservatorship, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Office of guardianship and conservatorship $1,200,000
Total general fund $1,200,000
Full-time equivalent positions 4.00
SECTION 8. TRANSFER. The office of management and budget shall transfer the full-time
equivalent attorney position authorized for the office of guardianship and conservatorship line item in
Senate Bill No. 2002 to the office of guardianship and conservatorship, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The remaining full-time equivalent positions authorized for the
office of guardianship and conservatorship line item in Senate Bill No. 2002 shall transfer as caseload
permits but no later than April 1, 2026.
SECTION 9. TRANSFER. The office of management and budget shall transfer any unspent
appropriation authority authorized for the office of guardianship and conservatorship line item in Senate
Bill No. 2002 to the office of guardianship and conservatorship, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
and ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 10. TRANSFER. The office of management and budget shall transfer any unspent
appropriation authority for guardianship related services and grants from the department of health and
human services in House Bill No. 1012 to the office of guardianship and conservatorship, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 11. TRANSFER. The office of management and budget shall transfer any unspent
appropriation authority from the guardianship grants line item in Section 1 of House Bill No. 1015 to the
office of guardianship and conservatorship, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending
June 30, 2027.

S. B. NO. 2029 - PAGE 11
SECTION 12. ATTORNEY GENERAL - EMERGENCY COMMISSION REQUEST. During the
2025-26 interim, the attorney general may submit a request to the emergency commission in
accordance with chapter 54-16 to request authorization and related funding for one full-time equivalent
position for the bureau of criminal investigation related to guardianship and conservatorship case
investigations. Prior to submitting a request, the office of guardianship and conservatorship must be
operational and the attorney general must identify an increase in workload related to guardianship and
conservatorship case investigations which necessitates the addition of one full-time equivalent position.
SECTION 13. EFFECTIVE DATE.
1. Sections 54-68-08, 54-68-10, and 54-68-11, as created in Section 4 of this Act, become
effective on April 1, 2026.
2. Sections 6, 9, 10 and 11 of this Act become effective on April 1, 2026.

S. B. NO. 2029 - PAGE 12
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2029.
Senate Vote: Yeas 40 Nays 5 Absent 2
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 0 Absent 3
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State